04_Morphology/ger.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%<sing%> %<plur%> !plurality, singular and plural
%<nom%> %<akk%> %<dat%> %<gen%> !case, Nominative, Accusative, Dative, Genitive
%<masc%> %<fem%> %<neu%> %<p%> !gender, Masculine, Feminine, Neuter, and a placeholder for Plural

LEXICON Root
article ;

LEXICON article
%<plur%>%<p%>:die PRootsNA ;
%<plur%>%<p%>:den PRootsD ;
%<plur%>%<p%>:der PRootsG ;
%<sing%>%<masc%>:der SRootsMN ;
%<sing%>%<masc%>:den SRootsMA ;
%<sing%>%<masc%>:dem SRootsMD ;
%<sing%>%<masc%>:des SRootsMG ;
%<sing%>%<fem%>:die SRootsFNA ;
%<sing%>%<fem%>:der SRootsFDG ;
%<sing%>%<neu%>:das SRootsNNA ;
%<sing%>%<neu%>:dem SRootsND ;
%<sing%>%<neu%>:des SRootsNG ;

LEXICON PRootsD !Dative 
%<dat%>:Mütter Dative ;
%<dat%>:Väter Dative ;
%<dat%>:Schwestern # ;
%<dat%>:Brüder Dative ;
%<dat%>:Häuser Dative ; 
%<dat%>:Betten # ;
%<dat%>:Tische Dative ;
%<dat%>:Türen # ;
%<dat%>:Autos # ;
%<dat%>:Flugzeuge Dative ;
%<dat%>:Städte Dative ;
%<dat%>:Züge Dative ;
%<dat%>:Länder Dative ;
%<dat%>:Berge Dative ;
%<dat%>:Frühstücke Dative ;
%<dat%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<dat%>:Abendessen # ;
%<dat%>:Busse # ;
%<dat%>:Ebenen # ;

LEXICON PRootsG !Genitive
%<gen%>:Mütter # ;
%<gen%>:Väter # ;
%<gen%>:Schwestern # ;
%<gen%>:Brüder # ;
%<gen%>:Häuser # ;
%<gen%>:Betten # ;
%<gen%>:Tische # ;
%<gen%>:Türen # ;
%<gen%>:Autos # ;
%<gen%>:Snacks # ;
%<gen%>:Busse # ;
%<gen%>:Flugzeuge # ;
%<gen%>:Städte # ;
%<gen%>:Züge # ;
%<gen%>:Berge # ;
%<gen%>:Ebenen # ;
%<gen%>:Frühstücke # ;
%<gen%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<gen%>:Abendessen # ;
%<dat%>:Snacks # ;

LEXICON PRootsNA ! Nominative and Accusative forms share the same article and form in Nominative and Accusative
%<nom%>:Mütter # ;
%<akk%>:Mütter # ;
%<nom%>:Väter # ;
%<akk%>:Väter # ;
%<nom%>:Schwestern # ;
%<akk%>:Schwestern # ;
%<nom%>:Brüder # ;
%<akk%>:Brüder # ;
%<nom%>:Häuser # ;
%<akk%>:Häuser # ;
%<nom%>:Betten # ;
%<akk%>:Betten # ;
%<nom%>:Tische # ;
%<akk%>:Tische # ;
%<nom%>:Türen # ;
%<akk%>:Türen # ;
%<nom%>:Autos # ;
%<akk%>:Autos # ;
%<nom%>:Busse # ;
%<akk%>:Busse # ;
%<nom%>:Flugzeuge # ;
%<akk%>:Flugzeuge # ;
%<nom%>:Züge # ;
%<akk%>:Züge # ;
%<nom%>:Städte # ;
%<akk%>:Städte # ;
%<nom%>:Länder # ;
%<akk%>:Länder # ;
%<gen%>:Länder # ;
%<nom%>:Berge # ;
%<akk%>:Berge # ;
%<nom%>:Ebenen # ;
%<akk%>:Ebenen # ;
%<nom%>:Frühstücke # ;
%<akk%>:Frühstücke # ;
%<nom%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<akk%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<nom%>:Abendessen # ;
%<akk%>:Abendessen # ;
%<nom%>:Snacks # ;
%<akk%>:Snacks # ;

LEXICON SRootsFNA !Singular feminine nouns share a nominative and accusative form with the same article
%<nom%>:Stadt # ;
%<akk%>:Stadt # ;
%<nom%>:Mutter # ;
%<akk%>:Mutter # ;
%<nom%>:Schwester # ;
%<akk%>:Schwester # ;
%<nom%>:Tür # ;
%<akk%>:Tür # ;
%<nom%>:Ebene # ;
%<akk%>:Ebene # ;

LEXICON SRootsFDG !Singular feminine nouns share a dative and genitive form with the same article
%<dat%>:Stadt # ;
%<gen%>:Stadt # ;
%<dat%>:Mutter # ;
%<gen%>:Mutter # ;
%<dat%>:Schwester # ;
%<gen%>:Schwester # ;
%<dat%>:Tür # ;
%<gen%>:Tür # ;
%<dat%>:Ebene # ;
%<gen%>:Ebene # ;

LEXICON SRootsND
%<dat%>:Haus # ;
%<dat%>:Bett # ;
%<dat%>:Auto # ;
%<dat%>:Flugzeug # ;
%<dat%>:Land # ;
%<dat%>:Frühstück # ;
%<dat%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<dat%>:Abendessen # ;

LEXICON SRootsNG
%<gen%>:Haus GenitiveES ;
%<gen%>:Bett Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Auto Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Flugzeug Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Land Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Frühstück Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Mittagessen Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Abendessen Genitive ;

LEXICON SRootsNNA
%<nom%>:Haus # ;
%<akk%>:Haus # ;
%<nom%>:Bett # ;
%<akk%>:Bett # ;
%<nom%>:Auto # ;
%<akk%>:Auto # ;
%<nom%>:Flugzeug # ;
%<akk%>:Flugzeug # ;
%<nom%>:Land # ;
%<akk%>:Land # ;
%<nom%>:Frühstück # ;
%<akk%>:Frühstück # ;
%<nom%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<akk%>:Mittagessen # ;
%<nom%>:Abendessen # ;
%<akk%>:Abendessen # ;

LEXICON SRootsMA
%<akk%>:Vater # ;
%<akk%>:Bruder # ;
%<akk%>:Tisch # ;
%<akk%>:Bus # ;
%<akk%>:Zug # ;
%<akk%>:Berg # ;
%<akk%>:Snack # ;

LEXICON SRootsMD
%<dat%>:Vater # ;
%<dat%>:Bruder # ;
%<dat%>:Tisch # ;
%<dat%>:Bus # ;
%<dat%>:Zug # ;
%<dat%>:Berg # ;
%<dat%>:Snack # ;

LEXICON SRootsMG
%<gen%>:Vater Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Bruder Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Tisch Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Bus GenitiveSES ;
%<gen%>:Zug Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Berg Genitive ;
%<gen%>:Snack Genitive ;

LEXICON SRootsMN
%<nom%>:Vater # ;
%<nom%>:Bruder # ;
%<nom%>:Tisch # ;
%<nom%>:Bus # ;
%<nom%>:Zug # ;
%<nom%>:Berg # ;
%<nom%>:Snack # ;

LEXICON Dative
:n # ;

LEXICON Genitive
:s # ;

LEXICON GenitiveES
:es # ;

LEXICON GenitiveSES
:ses # ;
